Washington statutes.
RCW 10.114.011

Independent investigation—Adoption of rules.

Except as required by federal consent decree, federal settlement agreement, or federal court order, where the use of deadly force by a peace officer results in death, substantial bodily harm, or great bodily harm, an independent investigation must be completed to inform any determination of whether the use of deadly force met the good faith standard established in RCW 9A.16.040 and satisfied other applicable laws and policies. The investigation must be completely independent of the agency whose officer was involved in the use of deadly force and conducted in accordance with chapter 43.102 RCW. Any rules adopted by the criminal justice training commission must be consistent with chapter 43.102 RCW.

[ 2021 c 318 s 401; 2019 c 4 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 318: See note following RCW 43.102.020.

Effective date—2019 c 4: See note following RCW 43.101.455.